Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Chapter 5. State Ports and Harbors
§ 59-5-45.
Manner and price of sale of bonds; interest; maturity and redemption.

The State Bond Commission shall sell such bonds at public sale or private sale, and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi, but no sale shall be made at a price of less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of par, plus accrued interest. However, the One Hundred Thirty Million Dollars ($130,000,000.00) additional bonds herein authorized shall mature annually, with all maturities not longer than twenty-five (25) years, and may be sold for a price of not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of par, plus accrued interest, to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. All bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually.

No interest payment due on any bond shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and supplemental coupons will not be permitted.

Notice of the public sale of any such bonds shall be published at least two (2) times, the first of which shall be made not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers having a general circulation in the City of Jackson and in one or more other newspapers or financial journals with a large national circulation, to be selected by the State Bond Commission.

The State Bond Commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this chapter, shall provide that bonds maturing eleven (11) or more years after the date of the issuance of such bonds may, at the option of the State of Mississippi, be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest, or on the tenth anniversary of the date of issue, or on any interest payment date thereafter prior to maturity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-17; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 17; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 7, § 4; Laws, 1974, ch. 484, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 456; Laws, 1976, ch. 415; Laws, 1980, ch. 530, § 4; Laws, 1982, ch. 425; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 35; Laws, 1991, ch. 397 § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 472, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1993).

§ 59-5-47.
Disposition of proceeds of bonds.

The proceeds of bonds issued under authority of this chapter shall be paid into a special fund or funds in banks qualified to act as depositories for the city or county in which the port or harbor is located, allocated in such equitable manner as the board may determine and such depositories shall qualify as such by depositing bonds or other securities authorized by law to secure deposits in state depositories. The proceeds of such bonds shall be used solely for payment of the cost of the planned development and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds and shall be disbursed upon order of the board with such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the planned development, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit which, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, the surplus shall be paid into the fund established for the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-18; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1958).

§ 59-5-49.
Validation of bonds.

Such bonds as are authorized by this chapter may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified or required by this chapter. The bonds authorized under the authority of this chapter may, in the discretion of the state bond commission, be validated in the chancery court of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided now or hereafter by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district, and other bonds. The necessary papers for such validation proceedings shall be transmitted to the state bond attorney by the attorney general, and the required notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city or county where the planned development is located.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-19; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1958).

§ 59-5-51.
Payment of interest and principal on bonds; limitation on amount of bonds issued.

The bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be payable from the special fund provided therefor as hereinafter set out and shall be the general obligations of the State of Mississippi and backed by the full faith and credit of the state, and if the funds supplied by the board to the State Treasurer from the sources prescribed by this chapter be insufficient to fully pay the interest on the bonds when due or to pay the principal of the bonds when due or when declared to be due as provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated, and all such bonds shall contain recitals on their face substantially covering the foregoing provisions of this section.

The amount of bonds issued for the acquisition and planned development of any one state port, harbor or waterway shall not exceed the sum of Eighty Million Dollars ($80,000,000.00) outstanding at any one time, nor shall any additional bonds be issued to complete the planned development of any other port, harbor or waterway to exceed in the aggregate the sum of Eighty Million Dollars ($80,000,000.00), outstanding at any one (1) time. However, such limitation on the amount of bonds that may be issued shall not apply to any additional bonds issued in connection with the planned development of any other port, harbor or waterway not to exceed in the aggregate the sum of One Hundred Thirty Million Dollars ($130,000,000.00) notwithstanding the provisions of Section 59-5-47, nor any other provisions to the contrary. The entire proceeds of the One Hundred Thirty Million Dollars ($130,000,000.00) shall be used solely for the construction or acquisition of ships, vessels, shipyards, shipbuilding facilities, machinery and equipment, dredges, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats or any other facilities required or incidental to the construction, outfitting, dry docking or repair of ships or vessels. However, no such additional bonds shall be issued except where such facility or facilities are to be leased or sold, in whole or in part, for industrial purposes and the annual payments made under the lease contract and/or proceeds of sale shall be sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds when due and to pay the principal of the bonds at or prior to maturity as provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds to finance such project, and all costs in connection therewith. Such lease shall have been first fully guaranteed by such person, firm or corporation, if any, having control, ownership or management of the lessee. Such lease and/or sale contract and the terms and conditions thereof, shall require the joint and several approval of the board of supervisors of the county in which the port is located, the port authority and the Department of Economic and Community Development. No borrowing under this section shall be finalized prior to ten (10) days after written notice of intent to borrow is furnished to the Legislative Budget Office.

No bonds shall be issued under this chapter after April 25, 2013.

The full five-mill ad valorem levy provided for by this chapter shall be levied and collected as needed for the retirement of any bonds issued under this chapter, and all rents, emoluments and charges made and collected by the port authority, less maintenance cost and incidental expenses, shall be covered in a fund to be used to retire all bonds issued under this chapter; and also all receipts from the two-mill state ad valorem levy, disbursed to such city, county or other port or harbor agency, shall be used to service such bonds.

In the event any city, county or other port, or harbor agency, however designated, shall pay to the board an amount insufficient to meet all bond and interest payments when due on their respective obligations, then any such delinquency paid by the state shall be deducted from future reimbursements for homestead exemptions under the provisions of Sections 27-33-1 through 27-33-65 from that portion reimbursed to the general county fund. Should the amount deducted from the homestead exemption reimbursement be insufficient to meet the delinquency, then the remainder of such delinquency shall be deducted from any distributions made under the provisions of Section 27-5-101 for gasoline taxes.

In the event all of the above-listed sources prove inadequate to pay the principal and interest on the bonds issued and paid for by the State of Mississippi under this chapter, then such city, county or other port or harbor agency shall levy and collect an additional ad valorem levy of not more than five (5) mills per year on all the taxable property of such city, county or other port or harbor agency, which funds so secured shall be applied toward such obligations to the State of Mississippi.

The requirements of subsections (2), (3) and (4) of this section shall not be applicable to the additional bonds in the aggregate amount of One Hundred Thirty Million Dollars ($130,000,000.00) authorized in subsection (1) of this section for the construction or acquisition of ships, vessels, shipyards, shipbuilding facilities, machinery and equipment, dredges, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats or any other facilities required or incidental to the construction, outfitting, dry docking or repair of ships or vessels; provided, such county shall, at the time of issuance of any of such bonds, convey to the State of Mississippi all of its right, title and interest in and to all of the land and above-mentioned shipbuilding facilities, together with the county’s right, title and interest in and to any leases, deeds, contracts or other customary business instruments which have been entered into in connection with the land and shipbuilding facilities, but such conveyance or conveyances shall be subject to the terms and provisions of such leases, deeds, contracts or other customary business instruments entered into in connection therewith. The right, title and interest of the State of Mississippi in the land and shipbuilding facilities shall be under the supervision and control of the Department of Economic and Community Development.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-20; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 20; Laws, 1960, ch. 404; Laws, 1964, ch. 425; Laws, 1966, ch. 447, § 1, ch. 448, § 1; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 7, § 5; Laws, 1968, ch. 432, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 530, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 250; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 14; Laws, 1995, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 567, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 25, 2013.).

§ 59-5-53.
Withdrawals of bond proceeds from special fund.

The funds which are transferred from the sale of bonds under this chapter to the special fund in the qualified depositories set up for each separate port, harbor, or part thereof may be withdrawn only in the following manner: said funds shall be paid by such qualified depositories upon warrants issued by the state auditor of public accounts, which warrants shall be issued upon requisition of the board or state port authority. All expenditures ordered by the board or state port authority shall be entered upon their minutes, and the board and each state port authority shall submit a full report of their work and all the transactions carried on by them, and a complete statement of all their revenues and expenditures to the legislature at each regular session of the legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-28; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1958).

§ 59-5-55.
Use of net revenues, rents, and earnings from state owned ports.

All net revenues, rents, and earnings from the operation or maintenance of any state owned port or harbor, or any part thereof, shall be set aside by the board exclusively for the payment of any bonds issued by the state for such port or harbor, or any part thereof, and shall not be commingled with the funds of any other state port or harbor, or any part thereof, but shall be expended by the board exclusively for the payment of such bonds as provided in Section 59-5-51, and if no such bonds shall be outstanding, then by the state port authority for the improvement, operation, advancement, development, maintenance and advertising of the port to which such funds have accrued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-10; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1958).

§ 59-5-57.
Payment of county’s share of state ad valorem taxes for harbor purposes to state port authority.

In the event of state ownership of any port or harbor, in its entirety, in any county which may now or hereafter be authorized by law to receive a portion of the state ad valorem tax for port or harbor purposes, such portion of the state ad valorem tax shall be paid to the state port authority and shall be used for the improvement, development, operation and expansion of such port under the provision of this chapter, and the port fund of such county to which such ad valorem tax is paid shall be subject to the requisition of the state port authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-10; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1958).

§ 59-5-59.
Allocation of revenues, rents and earnings to payment of bonds; sinking fund.

The net revenues, rents, and earnings derived from any planned development or the net revenues, rents, and earnings received by the board produced by a state port, harbor, or part thereof, for which bonds have been issued, shall be pledged and allocated by the board to the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds issued for such planned development as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide, and such pledge may include funds received from one or more or all sources available to such planned development and shall be set aside at regular intervals into a sinking fund, which sinking fund shall be pledged to and charged with the payment of:

The interest upon such bonds as such interest shall accrue.

The principal of the bonds when due, or when declared to be due, as prescribed by the resolution authorizing the bonds.

The necessary charges of the paying agent or paying agents for paying principal and interest of and on such bonds.

Any premium on bonds retired by call or purchase as may be provided therein.

Net revenues shall be defined in the agreement between the board and the city or county, or other authorized port or harbor agency, as provided in Sections 59-5-17 and 59-5-19.

The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided in the resolution authorizing any issue of bonds, but except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution such sinking fund shall be a fund for the benefit of all bonds issued under such resolution, without distinction or priority of one over the other. Subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, surplus moneys in the sinking fund may be applied to the purchase or redemption of any of such bonds, and any such bonds so purchased or redeemed shall forthwith be cancelled and shall not again be issued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7464-21; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 21; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 7, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 29, 1967).

§ 59-5-61.
Refunding bonds.

The board is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds by the state bond commission for the purpose of refunding any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter and then outstanding, together with interest thereon to the date of such refunding bonds, and redemption premium thereon, if any. The issuance of such refunding bonds, the maturity, and all other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof and the duties of the board and state port authority in respect thereto shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter in so far as the same may be applicable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-22; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1958).

§ 59-5-63.
Bonds as legal investments and securities for deposits of public funds.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies, the board of trustees of the public employees’ retirement system, and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-23; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1958).

§ 59-5-65.
Representation of Sate Bond Commission by Attorney General; payment of costs of sale, issuance and delivery of bonds.

Except as otherwise authorized in Section 7-5-39, the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall represent the State Bond Commission in issuing, selling and validating bonds herein provided for. The State Bond Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds herein provided for, and such costs may be paid for out of the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-27; Laws, 1958, ch. 365, § 27; Laws, 1991, ch. 397 § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 59-5-67.
Annual audit of state port authorities.

The books and accounts of all state port authorities shall be audited at the end of each fiscal year by the state auditor. A copy of the audit shall be filed with the governor, the state auditor, the state fiscal management board, legislative budget office and the Mississippi Board of Economic Development, and a copy shall be kept on file in the office of the particular state port authority so audited.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-32; Laws, 1970, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 251, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 59-5-69.
Annual budget of state port authorities.

Each state port shall adopt a complete, detailed and itemized budget for each fiscal year and all expenditures shall be made only pursuant to appropriation approved by the legislature and as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-33; Laws, 1970, ch. 304, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 252, eff from and after July 1, 1984.